Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4725
Commission; officers; elect.

The commission shall annually elect from its members a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary. At least one officer shall be a deaf or hard of hearing person. The vice-chairperson shall serve as chairperson in case of the absence or disability of the chairperson.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 250, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 16.